District of Columbia statutes.
38-106

Repealed

Removal of Superintendent.

Repealed.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 317, ch. 3446, § 3(2)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(d)
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1003(d), 54 DCR 4102
1981 Ed., § 31-110.
1973 Ed., § 31-108.